Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-757
Sections, how construed.

The provisions of sections 29-729 to 29-758 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purposes to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 29, p. 568.